New Jersey, session 222, S3015.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1. Section 5 of P.L.2013, c.209 (C.18A:40-41i) is amended to read as follows: 5.    A person who coaches a school district or nonpublic school athletic activity shall hold a current certification in [cardio-pulmonary] cardiopulmonary resuscitation, automated external defibrillator operation, and first aid from the American Red Cross, American Heart Association, or other training program recognized by the Department of Health. (cf: P.L.2013, c.209, s.5) 2. Section 1 of P.L.2019, c.292 (C.18A:40-41.11) is amended to read as follows: 1. a. The board of education of a school district and the governing body or chief school administrator of a nonpublic school that includes any of the grades six through 12 shall establish and implement an emergency action plan for responding to a serious or potentially life-threatening sports-related injury.  The plan shall document the proper procedures to be followed when a student sustains a serious injury while participating in sports or other athletic activity. The plan shall be specific to the activity site, and shall be developed in consultation with local emergency medical services personnel. b.    The emergency action plan established pursuant to subsection a. of this section shall include, but need not be limited to, the following components: (1)   a list of the employees, team coaches, and licensed athletic trainers in each school who are trained in first aid or cardio-pulmonary resuscitation; (2)   identification of the employees, team coaches, or licensed athletic trainers in each school who will be responsible for carrying out the emergency action plan and a description of their respective responsibilities; (3)   identification of any healthcare professionals who will provide medical care during games, practices, or other events; (4) identification of the activity location or venue; [(4)] (5)     identification of the equipment and supplies that may be needed to respond to the emergency, including the location of each item; [and] [(5)] (6) a description of the proper procedures to be followed after a student sustains a serious sports-related injury including, but not limited to, responding to the injured student, summoning emergency medical care, assisting emergency responders in getting to the injured student, and documenting the actions taken during the emergency; and (7) appropriate contact information for emergency medical services and directions to access the venue. c.     The emergency action plan shall be reviewed annually and updated as necessary.  The plan shall be rehearsed annually in each school by the individuals who will be responsible for executing the plan in an emergency. (cf: P.L.2019, c.292, s.1) 3. This act shall take effect immediately and shall first apply to the first full school year following the date of enactment.